en: Frame adjustability: Adjustable height; Adjustable length; Adjustable width; Fixed (non-adjustable); Height & angle adjustable (stand); Rotates/scrolls; Tilts/angle adjustable; Other
pt-PT: Adaptabilidade da estrutura: Altura ajustável; Comprimento ajustável; Largura ajustável; Fixo (não ajustável); Altura e ângulo ajustáveis (suporte); Roda/desliza; Inclinável/ângulo ajustável; Outro
zh-CN: 绣框可调性: 高度可调节; 长度可调节; 宽度可调节; 固定（不可调节）; 高度和角度可调节（支架）; 可旋转/滚动; 可倾斜/角度可调节; 其他
it: Regolabilità del Frame: Altezza regolabile; Lunghezza regolabile; Larghezza regolabile; Fisso (non regolabile); Altezza e angolazione regolabili (supporto); Rotante/scorrevole; Inclinabile/angolazione regolabile; Altro
hu: Keret állíthatósága: Állítható magasság; Állítható hosszúság; Állítható szélesség; Fix (nem állítható); Állítható magasság és dőlésszög (állvány); Forgatható / görgethető; Dönthető / állítható dőlésszög; Egyéb
de: Verstellbarkeit des Rahmens: Höhenverstellbar; Längenverstellbar; Breitenverstellbar; Fest (nicht verstellbar); Höhen- & winkelverstellbar (Ständer); Drehbar/scrollbar; Neigbar/winkelverstellbar; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Nastavljivost okvirja: Nastavljiva višina; Nastavljiva dolžina; Nastavljiva širina; Fiksno (nenastavljivo); Nastavljiva višina in kot (stojalo); Se vrti/drsno pomika; Z nagibom/nastavljiv kot; Drugo
bg-BG: Регулируемост на рамката: Регулируема височина; Регулируема дължина; Регулируема ширина; Фиксиран (нерегулируем); Регулируеми височина и ъгъл (стойка); Въртене/превъртане; Наклон/регулируем ъгъл; Друго
zh-TW: 框架可調解性: 高度可調; 長度可調; 寬度可調; 固定式 (不可調整); 高度與角度可調 (立架); 旋轉/滾動; 傾斜/角度可調; 其他
nb: Justerbarhet for ramme: Justerbar høyde; Justerbar lengde; Justerbar bredde; Fast (ikke justerbar); Høyde og vinkel justerbar (stativ); Roterer/ruller; Vippbar / justerbar vinkel; Annet
ko: 프레임 조절 기능: 높이 조절 가능; 길이 조절 가능; 너비 조절 가능; 고정식(조절 불가); 높이 및 각도 조절 가능(스탠드); 회전/스크롤; 기울기/각도 조절 가능; 기타
tr: Çerçeve ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir yükseklik; Ayarlanabilir uzunluk; Ayarlanabilir genişlik; Sabit (ayarlanamaz); Yükseklik ve açı ayarlı (stand); Döner/kaydırılabilir; Eğilebilir/açı ayarlı; Diğer
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť rámu: Nastaviteľná výška; Nastaviteľná dĺžka; Nastaviteľná šírka; Pevné (nenastaviteľné); Nastaviteľná výška a uhol (stojan); Otáčanie/posúvanie; Nakláňanie/nastaviteľný uhol; Iné
lt-LT: Rėmo reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas aukštis; Reguliuojamas ilgis; Reguliuojamas plotis; Fiksuotas (nereguliuojamas); Reguliuojamas aukštis ir kampas (stovas); Sukasi / slenka; Pakreipiamas / reguliuojamas kampas; Kita
da: Rammejusterbarhed: Justerbar højde; Justerbar længde; Justerbar bredde; Fast (ikke-justerbar); Justerbar højde og vinkel (stativ); Roterer/scroller; Kan vippes/vinkeljusterbar; Andet
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh của khung: Chiều cao có thể điều chỉnh; Chiều dài có thể điều chỉnh; Chiều rộng có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định (không thể điều chỉnh); Chiều cao & góc có thể điều chỉnh (giá đỡ); Xoay/cuộn; Có thể nghiêng/điều chỉnh góc; Khác
el: Δυνατότητα προσαρμογής πλαισίου: Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος; Ρυθμιζόμενο μήκος; Ρυθμιζόμενο πλάτος; Σταθερό (μη ρυθμιζόμενο); Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος και γωνία (βάση); Περιστρέφεται/κυλάει; Ανακλινόμενο/με ρυθμιζόμενη γωνία; Άλλο
fi: Rungon säädettävyys: Säädettävä korkeus; Säädettävä pituus; Säädettävä leveys; Kiinteä (ei säädettävä); Korkeus ja kulma säädettävissä (jalusta); Pyörivä/vierivä; Kallistettava / säädettävä kulma; Muu
pl: Możliwość regulacji ramy: Regulowana wysokość; Regulowana długość; Regulowana szerokość; Stała (nieregulowana); Regulowana wysokość i kąt (stojak); Obrotowa/przewijana; Pochylana/z regulacją kąta; Inna
hr-HR: Podesivost okvira: Podesiva visina; Podesiva duljina; Podesiva širina; Fiksno (nepodesivo); Podesiva visina i kut (stalak); Rotira se / pomiče; Podesiv nagib/kut; Ostalo
th: ความสามารถในการปรับแต่งโครง: ปรับความสูงได้; ปรับความยาวได้; ปรับความกว้างได้; แบบตายตัว (ปรับไม่ได้); ปรับความสูงและมุมได้ (ขาตั้ง); หมุน/เลื่อนได้; เอียง/ปรับมุมได้; อื่นๆ
fr: Réglage du cadre: Hauteur réglable; Longueur réglable; Largeur réglable; Fixe (non réglable); Hauteur et angle réglables (support); Rotatif/défilant; Inclinable/angle réglable; Autre
ja: フレーム調節機能: 高さ調整可能; 長さ調整可能; 幅調整可能; 固定式 (調整不可); 高さ・角度調整可能 (スタンド); 回転/スクロール可能; チルト/角度調整可能; その他
ro-RO: Posibilitatea de reglare a cadrului: Înălțime ajustabilă; Lungime ajustabilă; Lățime ajustabilă; Fix (neajustabil); Înălțime și unghi ajustabile (suport); Rotire/derulare; Înclinare/unghi ajustabil; Altele
es: Capacidad de ajuste del marco: Altura ajustable; Longitud ajustable; Ancho ajustable; Fijo (no ajustable); Altura y ángulo ajustables (soporte); Giratorio/desplazable; Inclinable/ángulo ajustable; Otro
sv: Ramjustering: Justerbar höjd; Justerbar längd; Justerbar bredd; Fast (ej justerbar); Justerbar höjd och vinkel (stativ); Roterar/rullar; Lutningsbar/vinkeljusterbar; Övrigt
cs: Nastavitelnost rámu: Nastavitelná výška; Nastavitelná délka; Nastavitelná šířka; Pevný (nenastavitelný); Nastavitelná výška a úhel (stojan); Otočný / rolovací; Naklápěcí / nastavitelný úhel; Jiné
nl: Verstelbaarheid frame: In hoogte verstelbaar; In lengte verstelbaar; In breedte verstelbaar; Vast (niet-verstelbaar); Hoogte en hoek verstelbaar (standaard); Draait/scrollt; Kantelbaar/hoek verstelbaar; Overige
pt-BR: Ajuste da moldura: Altura ajustável; Comprimento ajustável; Largura ajustável; Fixo (não ajustável); Altura e ângulo ajustáveis (suporte); Gira/rola; Inclinação/ângulo ajustável; Outro
ru: Регулируемость рамы: Регулируемая высота; Регулируемая длина; Регулируемая ширина; Фиксированная (нерегулируемая); Регулировка высоты и угла наклона (на подставке); Вращается / прокручивается; Настраиваемый угол наклона; Другое